Tennessee, session 114, SB2241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 7, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The commissioner of economic and community development shall research the
feasibility of establishing a development corridor, to be called the Oak Ridge Energy
Park, located in and spanning parts of Anderson and Roane counties. The
commissioner shall submit the results of such research, along with any findings, in a
report to the governor on or before December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2241
012411
- 1 -